unified/qu_EC.aff
# VERBS COMMON CONJUGATIONS common second level
#SFX flag strip add match
SFX c Y 56                 #Verbs: conjugations and the like
SFX c na na//+ na          # Infinitive singulars
SFX c na ni//+ na          # Present 1st person singular
SFX c na nki//+ na         # Present 2nd person singular | Future 2nd person singular/plural
SFX c na n//+ na           # Present 3rd person singular
SFX c na nchik//+ na       # Present 1st person plural
SFX c na nkichik//+ na     # Present 2nd person plural
SFX c na nkuna//+ na       # Present 3nd person plural
SFX c na sha//+ na         # Future 1st person singular
SFX c na nka//+ na         # Future 3rd person singular/plural
SFX c na nkarayku//+ na    # "With the purpose of ~"
SFX c na shun//+ na        # Future / Imperative 1st person plural
SFX c na shunchik//+ na    # Future 1st person plural ("all of us")
SFX c na rkani//+ na       # Past 1st person singular
SFX c na rkanki//+ na      # Past 2nd person singular
SFX c na rka//+ na         # Past 3rd person singular
SFX c na rkanchik//+ na    # Past 1st person plural
SFX c na rkankichik//+ na  # Past 2nd person plural
SFX c na rkakuna//+ na     # Past 3nd person plural
SFX c na nkapak//+ na      # for/to ~
SFX c na shpaka//+ na      # Contitional same person
SFX c na kpika//+ na       # Contitional other person
SFX c na rkakpi//+ na      # Conditional Past 3rd person singular
SFX c na k//+ na           # Personification
SFX c na y//+ [^i]na       # Imperative 1st person singular not ending in "I" / Nounification
SFX c ina i//+ ina         # Imperative 1st person singular ending in "I"/ Nounification 
SFX c na yuk//+ na         # The person having nounified ~ 
SFX c na nayay//+ na       # Causing ~ 
SFX c na yari// na         # More Imperative 1st person singular
SFX c na chun//+ na        # Imperative 3rd person singular / Present subjunctive
SFX c na ychik//+ [^i]na   # Imperative 2nd person plural not ending in "I"
SFX c ina ichik//+ ina     # Imperative 2nd person plural ending in "I"
SFX c na chunkuna//+ na    # Imperative 3rd person plural
SFX c na shkani//+ na      # Perfect 1st person singular
SFX c na shkanki//+ na     # Perfect 2nd person singular
SFX c na shka//+ na        # Perfect 3rd person singular
SFX c na shkanchik//+ na   # Perfect 1st person plural
SFX c na shkankichik//+ na # Perfect 2nd person plural
SFX c na shkakuna//+ na    # Perfect 3rd person plural
SFX c na shkarka//+ na     # Plusperfect [persons?]
SFX c na shpa//+ na        # Gerund same person.
SFX c na shkanka//+ na     # Was going to ~
SFX c na pasha//+ na       # POLITE Future 1st person singular
SFX c na panki//+ na       # POLITE Present 2nd person singular | Future 2nd person singular/plural
SFX c na pan//+ na         # POLITE Present 3rd person singular
SFX c na panchik//+ na     # POLITE Present 1st person plural
SFX c na pankichik//+ na   # POLITE Present 2nd person plural
SFX c na parkani//+ na     # POLITE Past 1rd person singular
SFX c na parkanki//+ na    # POLITE Past 2nd person singular
SFX c na parkanchik//+ na  # POLITE Past 2nd person plural
SFX c na parka//+ na       # POLITE Past 3rd person singular
SFX c na pashun//+ na      # POLITE Future 1st person plural
SFX c na pay//+ na         # POLITE Imperative 1st person singular not ending in "I" / Nounification
SFX c na payari// na       # POLITE More Imperative 1st person singular
SFX c na pachun//+ na      # POLITE Imperative 3rd person singular / Present subjunctive
SFX c na paychik//+ na     # POLITE Imperative 2nd person plural
SFX c na pachunkuna//+ na  # POLITE Imperative 3rd person plural

# VERBS COMMON CONJUGATIONS pluralized first level
# (copy the compatible variants from /v above)
#SFX flag strip add match

## the double ## below means version 2: not yuya|nariku|na but yuya|RINAKU|na
# could be this is correct for other verbs...

SFX w Y 26
SFX w 0 na//+p na            # AMONGST~ stem/Infinitive
SFX w 0 rina//+p na          # AMONGST~ reflexive
SFX w 0 rimuna//+p na        # AMONGST~ reflexive "arriving ~ing"
SFX w 0 richina//+p na       # AMONGST~ reflexive "make ~"
SFX w 0 rikrina//+p na       # AMONGST~ reflexive "going to ~"
SFX w 0 rinakuna//+p na      ## AMONGST~ reflexive "constantly ~"
SFX w 0 krina//+p na         # AMONGST~ "going to ~"
SFX w 0 rana//+p na          # AMONGST~ "always ~"
SFX w 0 riyana//+p na        # AMONGST~ "always ~"
SFX w 0 kuna//+p na          # AMONGST~ "constantly ~"
SFX w 0 kumuna//+p na        # AMONGST~ "constantly arriving doing ~"
SFX w 0 kumurina//+p na      # AMONGST~ "constantly arriving doing ~ reflexiwe"
SFX w 0 kuchina//+p na       # AMONGST~ "constantly make ~"
SFX w 0 kukrina//+p na       # AMONGST~ "constantly going to ~"
SFX w 0 nakukrina//+p na     # AMONGST~ "constantly going to ~"
SFX w 0 muna//+p na          # AMONGST~ "arriving ~ing"
SFX w 0 muwana//+p na        # AMONGST~ "arriving ~ing in my fawor"
SFX w 0 mukrina//+p na       # AMONGST~ "going to arrive ~ing" 
SFX w 0 mukuna//+p na        # AMONGST~ "constantly arriving ~ing"
SFX w 0 wana//+p na          # AMONGST~ "doing ~ in my favor"
SFX w 0 china//+p na         # AMONGST~ "make ~"
SFX w 0 chiwana//+p na       # AMONGST~ "make ~ in my favor"
SFX w 0 chirina//+p na       # AMONGST~ "make ~ for oneself"
SFX w 0 chikuna//+p na       # AMONGST~ "constantly making ~"
SFX w 0 chikrina//+p na      # AMONGST~ "going to make ~"
SFX w 0 chimuna//+p na       # AMONGST~ "arriving making ~"
