unified/qu_EC.dic
achikyana//vw
acusana//vw
advertina//vw
akapana//vw
aklluna//vw
akuna//vw
allana//vw
allawkayana//vw
allishunkunayana//vw
alliyachina//vw
alzana//vw
amintanayana//vw
amkasnayana//vw
amsanayana//vw
amuknayana//vw
amullina//vw
anchuchina//vw
anchurina//vw
ankasnayana//vw
ankuyana//vw
apana//vw
apoyana//vw
armana//vw
ashanayana//vw
ashnaknayana//vw
ashnana//vw
asina//vw
aspina//vw
awana//vw
aysana//vw
ayunpakuna//vw
bendiciyana//vw
brujuna//vw
cambiana//vw
casarana//vw
chacrana//vw
chakina//vw
chaknana//vw
challana//vw
challchuyana//vw
challiyana//vw
chamukyana//vw
chapana//vw
chariknayana//vw
charina//vw
charkinayana//vw
chashpina//vw
chaspina//vw
chawanayana//vw
chawanyana//vw
chawchanayana//vw
chawpina//vw
chawpirina//vw
chayachina//vw
chichuna//vw
chichuyana//vw
chikanyana//vw
chiktana//vw
chillpinayana//vw
chimpana//vw
chimpapurachina//vw
chinkachina//vw
chinkayana//vw
chirinayana//vw
chishiyana//vw
chukana//vw
chukrina//vw
chullayana//vw
chulluyana//vw
chulunyana//vw
chunkana//vw
chunkayana//vw
chunuyana//vw
churana//vw
chushaknayana//vw
chuskunayana//vw
chusunayana//vw
chutana//vw
chuyanayana//vw
confiana//vw
convidana//vw
decidina//vw
desanimana//vw
discretoyana//vw
encinanayana//vw
escribina//vw
faltana//vw
fichuyana//vw
fielyana//vw
gratisyana//vw
hilluyana//vw
humildeyana//vw
ikinayana//vw
illaknayana//vw
illana//vw
iñina//vw
inventana//vw
irina//vw
irkiyana//vw
ishkayyana//vw
ishpana//vw
iskunyana//vw
ismunayana//vw
jachachina//vw
jakanyana//vw
jampina//vw
jamuktana//vw
janakyna//vw
jananikyana//vw
japina//vw
jasmana//vw
jatunnayana//vw
jawanayana//vw
jawina//vw
jayakyana//vw
jichana//vw
jikina//vw
juchana//vw
juilluyana//vw
jukuna//vw
jukuyana//vw
juntana//vw
juruna//vw
juzgana//vw
kacharina//vw
kakuna//vw
kallarina//vw
kamana//vw
kamchana//vw
kana//vw
kanchisyana//vw
kankurina//vw
kapaknayana//vw
kaparina//vw
karana//vw
kariyana//vw
karkayana//vw
karuyana//vw
kashtuna//vw
kasiyana//vw
kaspiyana//vw
katana//vw
katuna//vw
kaupuna//vw
kawina//vw
kawsana//vw
kayana//vw
kichkiyana//vw
kichurina//vw
kikinyana//vw
killanayana//vw
killkana//vw
killunayana//vw
kimina//vw
kimsanayana//vw
kinchana//vw
kinkuna//vw
kipayana//vw
kishpirina//vw
kitayana//vw
krina//vw
kuchunayana//vw
kullunayana//vw
kulunnayana//vw
kumuna//vw
kunana//vw
kunkana//vw
kunuknayana//vw
kununa//vw
kurkuyana//vw
kusana//vw
kushichina//r>+-,wv
kushinayana//vw
kushnichina//vw
kushparina//vw
kutana//vw
kutimuna//vw
kutsinayana//vw
kutuna//vw
kutuyana//vw
kuyana//vw
kuyuchina//vw
kuyurina//vw
lanchana//vw
llakina//vw
llakllana//vw
llampunayana//vw
llankana//vw
llashakyana//vw
llatana//vw
llatanyana//vw
llikina//vw
llikiyana//vw
llimpikyana//vw
llimpiyakyana//vw
lliwina//vw
lluchkanayana//vw
lluchuna//vw
lluchuyana//vw
llukchina//vw
llukiyana//vw
llullaknayana//vw
llullana//vw
llulluyana//vw
llumiyana//vw
llupina//vw
llushtuna//vw
lunyana//vw
machana//vw
mallina//vw
mañana//vw
mancharina//vw
mantinina//vw
maskana//vw
mawkayana//vw
mayayana//vw
mayllanayana//vw
mayornayana//vw
maywanayana//vw
medina//vw
mikuna//vw
millaynayana//vw
millpuna//vw
minkachina//vw
mirana//vw
mishana//vw
mishkinayana//vw
mitina//vw
mitsakyana//vw
miyuna//vw
mukachina//vw
mulana//vw
muruchunayana//vw
muruyana//vw
mushukyana//vw
muspana//vw
muspayana//vw
mutkichina//vw
mutsuna//vw
muyuyana//vw
nanana//vw
ñañunayana//vw
ñawchina//vw
nayana//vw
ñitina//vw
ñutuna//vw
ñutuyana//vw
obedecina//vw
operana//vw
pakana//vw
pakina//vw
paktanayana//vw
pakunayana//vw
pallana//vw
pankallanayana//vw
pantachina//vw
pantanayana//vw
parana//vw
parlana//vw
pasayana//vw
pataknayana//vw
patarina//vw
perdonana//vw
piminayana//vw
piñana//vw
piñayana//vw
pinkanayana//vw
pintana//vw
pishkanayana//vw
pitina//vw
preparana//vw
puchuna//vw
pukanayana//vw
pukllana//vw
pulasnayana//vw
puluna//vw
puñuna//vw
purayana//vw
purunnayana//vw
pushana//vw
puskuna//vw
pusuyana//vw
puyuna//vw
puzukyana//vw
rakina//vw
rasuna//vw
rawnana//vw
regana//vw
richaknayana//vw
richana//vw
rikchana//vw
riksina//vw
rikuna//vw
rimana//vw
rogana//vw
rukunayana//vw
runtuna//vw
rurana//vw
sakina//vw
sakmana//vw
sakrayana//vw
samana//vw
sañiyana//vw
sankuyana//vw
sapallanayana//vw
saruna//vw
satina//vw
sawarina//vw
saytiyana//vw
semana//vw
shalakanayana//vw
shayaknayana//vw
shayana//vw
shaykuna//vw
shinanayana//vw
shinayana//vw
shuktaknayana//vw
shunkuna//vw
shutichina//vw
shutiyana//vw
shuwana//vw
shuyuna//vw
shuyushkayana//vw
sinchinayana//vw
sinkuna//vw
sipina//vw
sirina//vw
sisana//vw
soloyana//vw
suchunayana//vw
sufrina//vw
suktayana//vw
sumakyana//vw
tacana//vw
takina//vw
takshana//vw
tallirina//vw
taniknayana//vw
tankana//vw
tantana//vw
tapana//vw
tarina//vw
tikllanayana//vw
tikpana//vw
tikrana//vw
tinkana//vw
tipina//vw
tocana//vw
trankana//vw
tsagnana//vw
tsalayana//vw
tsankanayana//vw
tsantsanayana//vw
tsikllanayana//vw
tsiknina//vw
tsuktsukina//vw
tsuntsunayana//vw
tuksina//vw
tukuchina//vw
tukyana//vw
tullpuna//vw
tuñirina//vw
tupuna//vw
tutayana//vw
ukinayana//vw
ukllana//vw
ukuyana//vw
unana//vw
ungina//vw
unkuna//vw
upanayana//vw
upiyana//vw
urayana//vw
uriyana//vw
ushana//vw
utilizana//vw
uyana//vw
valina//vw
violana//vw
wachana//vw
wakaychina//vw
wakaysikiyana//vw
wakchayana//vw
wakllina//vw
wakllishkayana//vw
wakunayana//vw
walutunayana//vw
waminsinayana//vw
wampuna//vw
wankuna//vw
wañuna//vw
washannayana//vw
washayana//vw
washina//vw
watana//vw
watuna//vw
waykana//vw
wayllayana//vw
wayrana//vw
wichana//vw
wichinayana//vw
wichkana//vw
willkana//vw
wiñana//vw
wirayana//vw
wishkana//vw
wisiyana//vw
yachakuna//vw
yakuyana//vw
yallinayana//vw
yananayana//vw
yana//xvw
yankana//vw
yanuna//vw
yapuna//vw
yarina//vw
yupana//vw
yurakyana//vw
yuyakyana//vw
yuyaynayana//vw
